Utah statutes.
10-7-32.   Actions to recover taxes.
It shall also be competent for any municipality to bring a civil action
against any party owning or operating any such railway liable to pay such
taxes to recover the amount thereof, or any part thereof, delinquent and
unpaid, in any court having jurisdiction of the amount, and obtain judgment
and have execution therefor, and no property, real or personal, shall be
exempt from any such execution; provided, that real estate may not be levied
upon by execution except by execution out of the district court on judgment
therein, or transcript of judgment filed therein, as is now or hereafter may
be provided by law.  No defense shall be allowed in any such civil action
except such as goes to the groundwork, equity and justice of the tax, and the
burden of proof shall rest upon the party assailing the tax.  In case part of
such special tax shall be shown to be invalid, unjust or inequitable, judgment
shall be rendered for such amount as is just and equitable.
